incubator/apertium-as-hi/apertium-as-hi.hi.dix
		<pardef n="आ_vblex">
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>हूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>हूँ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>या</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ये</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>या<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ये<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>उँगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>या</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>या</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>या<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>या<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हो</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ओगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mid"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>इए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>इए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>या</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहा<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>या<b/>था</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एगा</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="low"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ता<b/>है</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ते<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>हैं</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l><b/>रहे<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ए<b/>थे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>एँगे</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="hi"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<e lm="आ"><i>आ</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="कर"><i>कर</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="खिला"><i>खिला</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="खुल"><i>खुल</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="खो"><i>खो</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="खा"><i>खा</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="गा"><i>गा</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="गिर"><i>गिर</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="घट"><i>घट</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="जा"><i>जा</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="चल"><i>चल</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="चिल्ला"><i>चिल्ला</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="चुरा"><i>चुरा</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="जी"><i>जी</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="दबा"><i>दबा</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="नहा"><i>नहा</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="पका"><i>पका</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="बजा"><i>बजा</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="बना"><i>बना</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="सो"><i>सो</i><par n="आ_vblex"/></e>
